Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-723
State Capitol; monuments and memorials; permanent fixtures; removal with consent of Legislature.

All monuments and memorials now fixed to the building or the grounds of the State Capitol shall be regarded as permanent fixtures, and shall not be removed without the consent of the Legislature.

Laws 1953, c. 262, § 1, p. 872.